Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 3. Domestic Violence Prevention Services.

§ 63.2-1611.
Policy of Commonwealth; Department designated agency to coordinate state efforts.

The General Assembly declares that it is the policy of this Commonwealth to support the efforts of public and private community groups seeking to provide assistance to and treatment for the victims of domestic violence and to provide recognition to the need to combat all phases of domestic violence in this Commonwealth. To this end the Department is designated as the state agency responsible for coordinating state efforts in this regard.

History.

1980, c. 597, § 63.1-315; 2002, c. 747.

Law Review.

For survey of developments in Virginia domestic relations law for the year 1979-80, see 67 Va. L. Rev. 351 (1981).

§ 63.2-1612.
Responsibilities of Department; domestic violence prevention and services.

It shall be the responsibility of the Department, to the extent funds are appropriated by the General Assembly or otherwise made available:

To support, strengthen, evaluate, and monitor community-based domestic violence programs funded by the Department and to act as the administrator for state grant funds and the disbursal of federal funds pursuant to §§

63.2-1614

and

63.2-1615

;

To collaborate with the Statewide Domestic Violence Coalition in developing and implementing community-based programs to respond to and prevent domestic violence;

To prepare, disseminate, and present educational programs and materials on domestic violence to the local departments, community provider agencies, and the general public;

To support, strengthen, and act as a resource to local departments on issues of domestic violence, particularly as they relate to both adult and child protective services and self-sufficiency;

To establish minimum standards of training and provide educational programs to train workers in the fields of child and adult protective services in local departments and community-based domestic violence programs funded by the Department to identify domestic violence and provide effective referrals for appropriate services;

To provide training and educational opportunities on effective collaboration for all staff of local departments and community-based domestic violence programs;

To work with the Statewide Domestic Violence Coalition to (a) develop policies and procedures that guide the work of persons providing services to victims of domestic violence and their children; (b) implement methods to preserve the confidentiality of all domestic violence services records pursuant to §§

63.2-104

and

63.2-104.1

in order to protect the rights and safety of victims of domestic violence; (c) develop policies and implement methods to assure the confidentiality of records pertaining to the address or location of any shelter or facility assisted under the Family Violence Prevention and Services Act, 42 U.S.C. § 10401 et seq.; (d) collect, prepare, and disseminate statistical data on the occurrence of domestic violence and the services provided throughout the Commonwealth; (e) operate the Virginia Family Violence and Sexual Assault 24-hour toll-free hotline and the Statewide Domestic Violence Database (Vadata); and (f) provide a clearinghouse of information and technical assistance on intervention and prevention of domestic violence;

To encourage the use of existing information and referral agencies to provide specialized information on domestic violence;

To develop and maintain a statewide list of available community and state resources for the victims of domestic violence;

To provide technical assistance on establishing shelters, self-help groups and other necessary service delivery programs;

To provide leadership and coordination within the Department on domestic violence as it relates to child and adult abuse and neglect, benefits programs, Temporary Assistance to Needy Families, foster care prevention, child support enforcement, child care, and the promotion of healthy family relationships; and

To promote collaboration and cooperation with other state agencies, including the Department of Criminal Justice Services, the Department of Health, the Department of Housing and Community Development, the Office of the Attorney General, and the Virginia Employment Commission, for technical assistance, data collection and service delivery to facilitate the appropriate response to victims of domestic violence.

History.

1980, c. 597, § 63.1-317; 2002, c. 747; 2005, cc. 638, 685; 2006, c. 135.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 638 and 685 are nearly identical, and rewrote subdivisions 1, 4, 5; inserted subdivisions 7, 11, and 12; redesignated former subdivisions 2, 3, and 6 as subdivisions 8, 9, and 10; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 135, in subdivision 7, substituted “§§

63.2-104

and

63.2-104

.1” for “§

63.2-104

” in clause (b), inserted clause (c), and redesignated former clauses (c) through (e) as clauses (d) through (f).

Law Review.

For survey of developments in Virginia domestic relations law for the year 1979-80, see 67 Va. L. Rev. 351 (1981).

§ 63.2-1613.
Responsibilities of local departments.

Local departments may, to the extent that funds are available:

Promote interagency cooperation at the local level for technical assistance, data collection and service delivery; and

Provide services directly to victims of domestic violence.

History.

1985, c. 20, § 63.1-317.1; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1614.
Authority to receive and grant funds.

Subject to regulations of the Board and to the availability of state or federal funds for services to the victims of domestic violence, the Department is authorized to:

Receive state and federal funds for services to the victims of domestic violence;

Disperse funds through matching grants to local, public or private nonprofit agencies to provide service programs for the victims of domestic violence; and

Develop and implement grant mechanisms for funding such local services.

History.

1980, c. 597, § 63.1-318; 2002, c. 747.

Law Review.

For survey of developments in Virginia domestic relations law for the year 1979-80, see 67 Va. L. Rev. 351 (1981).

§ 63.2-1615.
What functions and services may be funded.

In dispersing funds through grants to local agencies to provide service programs for the victims of domestic violence, the Department may fund both administrative functions and the delivery of direct services, including a portion of: the operational costs of offices and shelters including staff, rent, utilities, travel and supplies; twenty-four-hour crisis intervention hotlines; counseling; information and referral; self-help groups; transportation; emergency shelter; and follow-up services.

History.

1980, c. 597, § 63.1-319; 2002, c. 747.

Law Review.

For survey of developments in Virginia domestic relations law for the year 1979-80, see 67 Va. L. Rev. 351 (1981).